Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 6
SIGNALS - SIGNS - MARKINGS

Cross references:

For penalties for class A and class B traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3)(a)(I).

42-4-601. Department to sign highways, where.

The department of transportation shall place and maintain such traffic control devices, conforming to its manual and specifications, upon state highways as it deems necessary to indicate and to carry out the provisions of this article or to regulate, warn, or guide traffic.

No local authority shall place or maintain any traffic control device upon any highway under the jurisdiction of the department of transportation except by the latter's permission.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2340, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-502 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-601 was relocated to § 42-4-701.

42-4-602. Local traffic control devices.

No local authority shall erect or maintain any stop sign or traffic control signal at any location so as to require the traffic on any state highway to stop before entering or crossing any intersecting highway unless approval in writing has first been obtained from the department of transportation.

Where practical no local authority shall maintain three traffic control signals located on a roadway so as to be within one minute's driving time (to be determined by the speed limit) from any one of the signals to the other without synchronizing the lights to enhance the flow of traffic and thereby reduce air pollution.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2340, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-503 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-602 was relocated to § 42-4-702.

42-4-603. Obedience to official traffic control devices.

No driver of a vehicle shall disobey the instructions of any official traffic control device including any official hand signal device placed or displayed in accordance with the provisions of this article unless otherwise directed by a police officer subject to the exceptions in this article granted the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle.

No provision of this article for which official traffic control devices are required shall be enforced against an alleged violator if at the time and place of the alleged violation an official device is not in proper position and sufficiently legible to be seen by an ordinarily observant person. Whenever a particular section does not state that official traffic control devices are required, such section shall be effective even though no devices are erected or in place.

Whenever official traffic control devices are placed in position approximately conforming to the requirements of this article, such devices shall be presumed to have been so placed by the official act or direction of lawful authority unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

Any official traffic control device placed pursuant to the provisions of this article and purporting to conform to the lawful requirements pertaining to such devices shall be presumed to comply with the requirements of this article unless the contrary is established by competent evidence.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2340, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-504 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-603 was relocated to § 42-4-703.

42-4-604. Traffic control signal legend.

If traffic is controlled by traffic control signals exhibiting different colored lights, or colored lighted arrows, successively one at a time or in combination as declared in the traffic control manual adopted by the department of transportation, only the colors green, yellow, and red shall be used, except for special pedestrian-control signals carrying a word or symbol legend as provided in section 42-4-802, and said lights, arrows, and combinations thereof shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles and pedestrians as follows:

Green indication:

Vehicular traffic facing a circular green signal may proceed straight through or turn right or left unless a sign at such place prohibits such turn; but vehicular traffic, including vehicles turning right or left, shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians lawfully within the intersection and to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk at the time such signal is exhibited.

Vehicular traffic facing a green arrow signal, shown alone or in combination with another indication, may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated by such arrow or such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same time. Such vehicular traffic shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.

Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 42-4-802, pedestrians facing any green signal, except when the sole green signal is a turn arrow, may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked crosswalk.

Steady yellow indication:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow signal is thereby warned that the related green movement is being terminated or that a red indication will be exhibited immediately thereafter.

Pedestrians facing a steady circular yellow or yellow arrow signal, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 42-4-802, are thereby advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway before a red indication is shown, and no pedestrian shall then start to cross the roadway.

Steady red indication:

Vehicular traffic facing a steady circular red signal alone shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until an indication to proceed is shown; except that:

Such vehicular traffic, after coming to a stop and yielding the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection, may make a right turn, unless state or local road authorities within their respective jurisdictions have by ordinance or resolution prohibited any such right turn and have erected an official sign at each intersection where such right turn is prohibited.

Such vehicular traffic, when proceeding on a one-way street and after coming to a stop, may make a left turn onto a one-way street upon which traffic is moving to the left of the driver. Such turn shall be made only after yielding the right-of-way to pedestrians and other traffic proceeding as directed. No turn shall be made pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B) if local authorities have by ordinance prohibited any such left turn and erected a sign giving notice of any such prohibition at each intersection where such left turn is prohibited.

To promote uniformity in traffic regulation throughout the state and to protect the public peace, health, and safety, the general assembly declares that no local authority shall have any discretion other than is expressly provided in this subparagraph (I).

Pedestrians facing a steady circular red signal alone shall not enter the roadway, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 42-4-802.

Vehicular traffic facing a steady red arrow signal may not enter the intersection to make the movement indicated by such arrow and, unless entering the intersection to make such other movement as is permitted by other indications shown at the same time, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then before entering the intersection and shall remain standing until an indication to make the movement indicated by such arrow is shown.

Pedestrians facing a steady red arrow signal shall not enter the roadway, unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 42-4-802.

Nonintersection signal: In the event an official traffic control signal is erected and maintained at a place other than an intersection, the provisions of this section shall be applicable except as to those provisions which by their nature can have no application. Any stop required shall be made at a sign or pavement marking indicating where the stop shall be made, but in the absence of any such sign or marking the stop shall be made at the signal.

Lane-use-control signals: Whenever lane-use-control signals are placed over the individual lanes of a street or highway, as declared in the traffic control manual adopted by the department of transportation, such signals shall indicate and apply to drivers of vehicles as follows:

Downward-pointing green arrow (steady): A driver facing such signal may drive in any lane over which said green arrow signal is located.

Yellow "X" (steady): A driver facing such signal is warned that the related green arrow movement is being terminated and shall vacate in a safe manner the lane over which said steady yellow signal is located to avoid if possible occupying that lane when the steady red "X" signal is exhibited.

Yellow "X" (flashing): A driver facing such signal may use the lane over which said flashing yellow signal is located for the purpose of making a left turn or a passing maneuver, using proper caution, but for no other purpose.

Red "X" (steady): A driver facing such signal shall not drive in any lane over which said red signal is exhibited.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2341, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-505 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-604 was relocated to § 42-4-704.

42-4-605. Flashing signals.

Whenever an illuminated flashing red or yellow signal is used in conjunction with a traffic sign or a traffic signal or as a traffic beacon, it shall require obedience by vehicular traffic as follows:

When a red lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles shall stop at a clearly marked stop line but, if none, before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering the intersection, and the right to proceed shall be subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign.

When a yellow lens is illuminated with rapid intermittent flashes, drivers of vehicles may proceed past such signal and through the intersection or other hazardous location only with caution.

This section shall not apply at railroad grade crossings. Conduct of drivers of vehicles approaching railroad crossings shall be governed by the provisions of sections 42-4-706 to 42-4-708.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2343, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-506 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-605 was relocated to § 42-4-705.

42-4-606. Display of unauthorized signs or devices.

No person shall place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, marking, or device which purports to be or is an imitation of or resembles an official traffic control device or railroad sign or signal, or which attempts to direct the movement of traffic, or which hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of any official traffic control device or any railroad sign or signal, and no person shall place or maintain nor shall any public authority permit upon any highway any traffic sign or signal bearing thereon any commercial advertising. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit the use of motorist services information of a general nature on official highway guide signs if such signs do not indicate the brand, trademark, or name of any private business or commercial enterprise offering the service, nor shall this section be deemed to prohibit the erection upon private property adjacent to highways of signs giving useful directional information and of a type that cannot be mistaken for official signs.

Every such prohibited sign, signal, or marking is declared to be a public nuisance, and the authority having jurisdiction over the highway is empowered to remove the same or cause it to be removed without notice.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to informational sites authorized under section 43-1-405, C.R.S.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to specific information signs authorized under section 43-1-420, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2344, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-507 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-606 was relocated to § 42-4-706.

42-4-607. Interference with official devices.

No person shall, without lawful authority, attempt to or in fact alter, deface, injure, knock down, remove, or interfere with the effective operation of any official traffic control device or any railroad sign or signal or any inscription, shield, or insignia thereon or any other part thereof. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who violates any provision of this paragraph (a) commits a class B traffic infraction.

No person shall possess or sell, without lawful authority, an electronic device that is designed to cause a traffic light to change. A person who violates any provision of this paragraph (b) commits a class B traffic infraction.

No person shall use an electronic device, without lawful authority, that causes a traffic light to change. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), a person who violates any provision of this paragraph (a) commits a class A traffic infraction.

A person who violates any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and thereby proximately causes bodily injury to another person commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense. In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, the court shall impose a fine of one thousand dollars.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2344, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 333, § 2, effective August 4.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 1711, § 1, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-508 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-608. Signals by hand or signal device.

Any stop or turn signal when required as provided by section 42-4-903 shall be given either by means of the hand and arm as provided by section 42-4-609 or by signal lamps or signal device of the type approved by the department, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section.

Any motor vehicle in use on a highway shall be equipped with, and the required signal shall be given by, signal lamps when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of such motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four inches or when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load thereof exceeds fourteen feet. The latter measurement shall apply to any single vehicle, also to any combination of vehicles.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2344, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-509 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-608 was relocated to § 42-4-707.

42-4-609. Method of giving hand and arm signals.

All signals required to be given by hand and arm shall be given from the left side of the vehicle in the following manner, and such signals shall indicate as follows:

Left-turn, hand and arm extended horizontally;

Right-turn, hand and arm extended upward;

Stop or decrease speed, hand and arm extended downward.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2345, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-510 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-609 was relocated to § 42-4-708.

42-4-610. Unauthorized insignia.

No owner shall display upon any part of the owner's vehicle any official designation, sign, or insignia of any public or quasi-public corporation or municipal, state, or national department or governmental subdivision without authority of such agency or any insignia, badge, sign, emblem, or distinctive mark of any organization or society of which the owner is not a bona fide member or otherwise authorized to display such sign or insignia. Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2345, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-512 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-610 was relocated to § 42-4-710.

42-4-611. Paraplegic persons or persons with disabilities - distress flag.

Any paraplegic person or person with a disability when in motor vehicle distress is authorized to display by the side of such person's disabled vehicle a white flag of approximately seven and one-half inches in width and thirteen inches in length, with the letter "D" thereon in red color with an irregular one-half inch red border. Said flag shall be of reflective material so as to be readily discernible under darkened conditions, and said reflective material must be submitted to and approved by the department of transportation before the same is used.

Any person desiring to use such display shall make application to the department, and the department may in its discretion issue to such person with a disability upon application a card that sets forth the applicant's name, address, and date of birth, the physical apparatus needed to operate a motor vehicle, if any, and any other pertinent facts that the department deems desirable, and in its discretion the department may issue a permit for the use of and issue to such person a display flag. Each such flag shall be numbered, and in the event of loss or destruction, a duplicate may be issued upon the payment of the sum of one dollar by such applicant. The department shall maintain a list of such applicants and persons to whom permits and flags have been issued and furnish a copy thereof to the Colorado state patrol upon request.

Any person who is not a paraplegic person or a person with a disability who uses such flag as a signal or for any other purpose is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than three hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten days nor more than ninety days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2345, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1643, § 29, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-513 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-611 was relocated to § 42-4-711.

42-4-612. When signals are inoperative or malfunctioning.

When a driver approaches an intersection and faces a traffic control signal that is inoperative, that remains on steady red or steady yellow during several time cycles, or that does not recognize a motorcycle that is operated by the driver, the provisions controlling entrance to a through street or highway from a stop sign or highway, as provided under section 42-4-703, apply until a police officer assumes control of traffic or until the traffic control signal resumes normal operation.

If a traffic control signal at a place other than an intersection ceases to operate or malfunctions as specified in subsection (1)(a) of this section, drivers may proceed past the signal only with caution, as if the signal were flashing yellow.

Whenever a pedestrian faces a pedestrian-control signal as provided in section 42-4-802 which is inoperative or which remains on "Don't Walk" or "Wait" during several time cycles, such pedestrian shall not enter the roadway unless the pedestrian can do so safely and without interfering with any vehicular traffic.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2346, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2019:

(1) amended, (SB 19-144), ch. 126, p. 571, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-514 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-612 was relocated to § 42-4-1903.

42-4-613. Failure to pay toll established by regional transportation authority.

Any person who fails to pay a required fee, toll, rate, or charge established by a regional transportation authority created pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of title 43, C.R.S., for the privilege of traveling on or using any property included in a regional transportation system pursuant to part 6 of article 4 of title 43, C.R.S., commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 498, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1069, § 17, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2005 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 269, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

42-4-614. Designation of highway maintenance, repair, or construction zones - signs - increase in penalties for speeding violations.

If maintenance, repair, or construction activities are occurring or will occur within four hours on a portion of a state highway, the department of transportation may designate such portion of the highway as a highway maintenance, repair, or construction zone. Any person who commits certain violations listed in section 42-4-1701 (4) in a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated pursuant to this section is subject to the increased penalties and surcharges imposed by section 42-4-1701 (4)(c).

If maintenance, repair, or construction activities are occurring or will occur within four hours on a portion of a roadway that is not a state highway, the public entity conducting the activities may designate such portion of the roadway as a maintenance, repair, or construction zone. A person who commits certain violations listed in section 42-4-1701 (4) in a maintenance, repair, or construction zone that is designated pursuant to this section is subject to the increased penalties and surcharges imposed by section 42-4-1701 (4)(c).

The department of transportation or other public entity shall designate a maintenance, repair, or construction zone by erecting or placing an appropriate sign in a conspicuous place before the area where the maintenance, repair, or construction activity is taking place or will be taking place within four hours. Such sign shall notify the public that increased penalties for certain traffic violations are in effect in such zone. The department of transportation or other public entity shall erect or place a second sign after such zone indicating that the increased penalties for certain traffic violations are no longer in effect. A maintenance, repair, or construction zone begins at the location of the sign indicating that increased penalties are in effect and ends at the location of the sign indicating that the increased penalties are no longer in effect.

Signs used for designating the beginning and end of a maintenance, construction, or repair zone shall conform to department of transportation requirements. The department of transportation or other public entity may display such signs on any fixed, variable, or movable stand. The department of transportation or other public entity may place such a sign on a moving vehicle if required for certain activities, including, but not limited to, highway painting work.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1385, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1222, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 2078, § 2, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 42-4-613 in House Bill 97-1003 but has been renumbered on revision for ease of location.

Cross references:

(1) In 2005, subsections (1) and (2) were amended by the "Lopez-Forrester act". For the short title and legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2005.

(2) Section 1 of chapter 412, Session Laws of Colorado 2008, provides that the act amending this section shall be known and may be cited as the "Charles Mather Highway Safety Act".

42-4-615. School zones - increase in penalties for moving traffic violations.

Any person who commits a moving traffic violation in a school zone is subject to the increased penalties and surcharges imposed by section 42-4-1701 (4)(d).

For the purposes of this section, "school zone" means an area that is designated as a school zone and has appropriate signs posted indicating that the penalties and surcharges will be doubled. The state or local government having jurisdiction over the placement of traffic signs and traffic control devices in the school zone area shall designate when the area will be deemed to be a school zone for the purposes of this section. In making such designation, the state or local government shall consider when increased penalties are necessary to protect the safety of school children.

This section does not apply if the penalty and surcharge for a violation has been doubled pursuant to section 42-4-614 because such violation also occurred within a highway maintenance, repair, or construction zone.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 588, § 1, effective July 1.

42-4-616. Wildlife crossing zones - increase in penalties for moving traffic violations.

Except as described by subsection (4) of this section, a person who commits a moving traffic violation in a wildlife crossing zone is subject to the increased penalties and surcharges imposed by section 42-4-1701 (4)(d.5).

For the purposes of this section, "wildlife crossing zone" means an area on a public highway that:

Begins at a sign that conforms to the state traffic control manual, was erected by the department of transportation pursuant to section 42-4-118, and indicates that a person is about to enter a wildlife crossing zone; and

Extends to:

A sign that conforms to the state traffic control manual, was erected by the department of transportation pursuant to section 42-4-118, and indicates that a person is about to leave a wildlife crossing zone; or

If no sign exists that complies with subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the distance indicated on the sign indicating the beginning of the wildlife crossing zone; or

If no sign exists that complies with subparagraph (I) or (II) of this paragraph (b), one-half mile beyond the sign indicating the beginning of the wildlife crossing zone.

If the department of transportation erects a sign that indicates that a person is about to enter a wildlife crossing zone pursuant to section 42-4-118, the department of transportation shall:

(I) Establish the times of day and the periods of the calendar year during which the area will be deemed to be a wildlife crossing zone for the purposes of this section; and

(II) Ensure that the sign indicates the times of day and the periods of the calendar year during which the area will be deemed to be a wildlife crossing zone for the purposes of this section.

In erecting signs as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the department of transportation, pursuant to section 42-4-118, shall not erect signs establishing a lower speed limit for more than one hundred miles of the public highways of the state that have been established as wildlife crossing zones.

This section shall not apply if:

The person who commits a moving traffic violation in a wildlife crossing zone is already subject to increased penalties and surcharges for said violation pursuant to section 42-4-614 or 42-4-615;

The sign indicating that a person is about to enter a wildlife crossing zone does not indicate that increased traffic penalties are in effect in the zone; or

The person who commits a moving traffic violation in a wildlife crossing zone commits the violation during a time that the area is not deemed by the department of transportation to be a wildlife crossing zone for the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1238), ch. 393, p. 1868, § 2, effective September 1.